Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-915
Budget; failure of county board to adopt; effect.

If for any reason the county board fails or neglects in any year to make the appropriation for the support, operation and maintenance of the county government for the fiscal year, then ninety percent of the several amounts appropriated in the last budget for the objects and purposes therein specified, insofar as the same shall relate to the support, operation and maintenance of the county government and the administration thereof, shall be deemed to be appropriated for the fiscal year for the several objects and purposes as specified in the said last budget.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 8, p. 228;

Laws 1939, c. 24, § 6, p. 131;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2108;

R.S.1943, § 23-915;

Laws 1945, c. 45, § 12, p. 218.